Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 8. Assignment of Partnership Interests

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1294 to 1306.

68 C.J.S. Partnership § 427.

§ 17-14-801.
Nature of partnership interest.

A partnership interest is personal property.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-802.
Assignment of partnership interest.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part. An assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights of a partner. An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distribution to which the assignor would be entitled. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner ceases to be a partner upon assignment of all his partnership interest.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-803.
Rights of creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest. This act does not deprive any partner of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to his partnership interest.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in the last sentence, see § 17-14-202(a)(xvi).

§ 17-14-804.
Right of assignee to become limited partner.

An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that:

The assignor gives the assignee that right in accordance with authority described in the partnership agreement; or

All other partners consent.

An assignee who has become a limited partner has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a limited partner under the partnership agreement and this act. An assignee who becomes a limited partner also is liable for the obligations of his assignor to make and return contributions as provided in articles 6 and 7. However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities unknown to the assignee at the time he became a limited partner.

If an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from his liability to the limited partnership under W.S.

17-14-307

and

17-14-602

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 17-14-202(a)(xvi).

§ 17-14-805.
Deceased or incompetent partner; dissolved or terminated partner.

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges him to be incompetent to manage his person or his property, the partner’s executor, administrator, guardian, conservator or other legal representative may exercise all the partner’s rights for the purpose of settling his estate or administering his property, including any power the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner. If a partner is a corporation, trust or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.